District of Columbia statutes.
24-1105

Construction of Compact.

The Compact shall not be construed to prohibit the adoption of any other plan or procedure for the District of Columbia for the return of any runaway juvenile.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 666, Pub. L. 91-358, title IV, § 405
1981 Ed., § 32-1105.
1973 Ed., § 32-1105.